Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1829
Authority; mortgage of certain property.

The authority may mortgage all or any portion of any project or any other facilities conveyed to the authority for such purpose and the site or sites thereof, whether presently owned or subsequently acquired, for the benefit of the holders of the bonds of the authority issued to finance such project or any portion thereof or issued to refund or refinance outstanding indebtedness or to reimburse an endowment or any similar fund of an elementary or secondary school as permitted by the Nebraska Elementary and Secondary School Finance Authority Act.

Laws 1997, LB 809, § 29.